Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PSEO ADJUSTMENT; PEQUOT LAKES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin PSEO adjustment. new text end new text begin (a) For a general education aid adjustment for Independent School District No. 186, Pequot Lakes, attributable to conflicting PSEO information provided to the school district: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Education must calculate the reduction in aid in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 to Independent School District No. 186, Pequot Lakes, attributable to PSEO students enrolled in the school district taking a combined course load at both the postsecondary institution and high school in excess of 1.0 pupils in average daily membership. new text end new text begin (c) 100 percent of the amount calculated in paragraph (b) must be paid to the school district in fiscal year 2026. new text end